Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-107, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-107. A. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Successful Adulthood Act".
B. The purpose of the Successful Adulthood Act shall be:
1. To ensure that eligible individuals, who have been or are in
the foster care program of the Department of Human Services or a
federally recognized Indian tribe with whom the Department has a
contract, due to abuse or neglect, receive the protection and
support necessary to allow those individuals to become self-reliant
and productive citizens through the provision of requisite services
that include, but are not limited to, transitional planning,
housing, medical coverage, and education; provided, that eligibility

for tuition waivers shall be as set forth in Section 3230 of Title
70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. To break the cycle of abuse and neglect that obligates the
state to assume custody of children; and
3. To help children who have experienced foster care at age
fourteen (14) or older achieve meaningful permanent connections with
a caring adult.
C. An individual is eligible to receive services for the
transition of the child to a successful adulthood from the age of
fourteen (14) until the age of eighteen (18), during the time the
individual is in the custody of the Department or a federally
recognized Indian tribe and in an out-of-home placement.
D. The permanency plan for the child in transition to a
successful adulthood shall be developed in consultation with the
child and, at the option of the child, with up to two members of the
permanency planning team to be chosen by the child, excluding the
foster parent and caseworker for the child, subject to the following
provisions:
1. One individual selected by the child may be designated to be
the advisor and, as necessary, advocate of the child, with respect
to the application of the reasonable and prudent parent standard to
the child; and
2. The Department may reject an individual selected by the
child to be a member of the permanency planning team at any time if
the Department has good cause to believe that the selected
individual would not act in the best interests of the child.
E. 1. Each child in foster care under the responsibility of
the Department or a federally recognized Indian tribe and in an out-
of-home placement, who has attained fourteen (14) years of age shall
be given a written Notice of Rights that describes the following
specific rights of the child:
a. the rights of the child with respect to education,
health, visitation, and court participation,
b. the right to be provided with the documents specified
in subsection F of this section, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 2361 Page 2

c. the right to stay safe and avoid exploitation.
2. The child shall sign an acknowledgment stating that the
child has been provided with a copy of the Notice of Rights and that
the rights described in the notice have been explained to the child
in an age-appropriate way.
F. A child about to leave foster care by reason of having
attained eighteen (18) years of age and who has been in foster care
for at least six (6) months shall be given the following documents
pertaining to the child:
1. An official or certified copy of the United States birth
certificate;
2. A Social Security card issued by the Commissioner of Social
Security;
3. Health insurance information Information about how to obtain
health insurance;
4. A copy of the medical records of the child;
5. A state-issued driver license or identification card; and
6. Official documentation necessary to show that the child was
previously in foster care; and
7. Any educational transcripts, diplomas, or professional
certificates earned while in the custody of the Department of Human
Services.
G. Successful adulthood services may continue to the age of
twenty-one (21), provided the individual is in the custody of the
Department or a federally recognized Indian tribe due to abuse or
neglect and is in an out-of-home placement at the time of the
individual's sixteenth birthday.
H. Individuals who are sixteen (16) years of age or older, who
have been released from the custody of the Department or federally
recognized Indian tribe due to the entry of an adoption decree or
guardianship order are eligible to receive successful adulthood
services until the age of twenty-one (21).
ENR. H. B. NO. 2361 Page 3

I. Individuals who are eligible for services pursuant to the
Successful Adulthood Act and who are between eighteen (18) and
twenty-one (21) years of age shall be eligible for Medicaid
coverage, provided such individuals were also in the custody of the
Department or a federally recognized Indian tribe on the date they
reached eighteen (18) years of age and meet Medicaid financial
eligibility guidelines.
J. The Department, in conjunction with the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education, shall provide parents and legal
guardians of foster youth with information on the Oklahoma Higher
Learning Access Program (OHLAP) including, but not limited to,
eligibility, application guidelines, academic requirements, and any
other information required by the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Act for participation in the Program.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-621 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A person who has been placed in the custody of the Office of
Juvenile Affairs, who has attained eighteen (18) years of age, and
who is being released from the custody of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs with a plan to re-enter the community as a resident of the
state shall be given the following documents pertaining to the
person upon release:
1. An official or certified copy of the United States birth
certificate;
2. A Social Security card issued by the Commissioner of Social
Security;
3. Information about how to obtain health insurance and
personal medical records;
4. A state-issued driver license or identification card; and
5. Any educational transcripts, diplomas, or professional
certificates earned while in the custody of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2361 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 15th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2361 Page 5